Iowa, session 2025-2026, SSB1214.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 5 TLSB 2933XC (3) 91 jm/md S.F. _____ Section 1. Section 15A.1, subsection 1, paragraph b, Code 1 2025, is amended to read as follows: 2 b. For purposes of this chapter , âeconomic developmentâ 3 means private or joint public and private investment involving 4 the creation of new jobs and income or the retention of 5 existing jobs and income that would otherwise be lost or the 6 provision of workforce housing . 7 Sec. 2. Section 15A.1, subsection 2, Code 2025, is amended 8 by adding the following new paragraph: 9 NEW PARAGRAPH . e. Development policies that advance the 10 development of workforce housing. 11 Sec. 3. Section 403.17, subsection 14, Code 2025, is amended 12 to read as follows: 13 14. âLow or and moderate income familiesâ means those 14 families, including single person households, earning no 15 more than eighty percent of the higher of the median family 16 income of the county or the statewide nonmetropolitan area as 17 determined by the latest United States department of housing 18 and urban development, section 8 income guidelines. 19 Sec. 4. Section 403.17, Code 2025, is amended by adding the 20 following new subsection: 21 NEW SUBSECTION . 14A. âLow and moderate income family 22 housingâ means housing for low and moderate income families and 23 includes housing that meets the requirements of section 15.353. 24 Sec. 5. Section 403.19, subsection 2, paragraph a, Code 25 2025, is amended to read as follows: 26 a. That portion of the taxes each year in excess of such 27 amount shall be allocated to and when collected be paid into a 28 special fund of the municipality to pay the principal of and 29 interest on loans, moneys advanced to, or indebtedness, whether 30 funded, refunded, assumed, or otherwise, including bonds 31 issued under the authority of section 403.9, subsection 1 , 32 incurred by the municipality to finance or refinance, in whole 33 or in part, an urban renewal project within the area, and to 34 provide assistance for low and moderate income family housing 35 -1- LSB 2933XC (3) 91 jm/md 1/ 5 S.F. _____ as provided in section 403.22 . However, except as provided 1 in paragraph âbâ , taxes for the regular and voter-approved 2 physical plant and equipment levy of a school district imposed 3 pursuant to section 298.2 , foundation property taxes of a 4 school district imposed under section 257.3, and taxes for the 5 instructional support program of a school district imposed 6 pursuant to section 257.19 , taxes for the payment of bonds 7 and interest of each taxing district, and taxes imposed under 8 section 346.27, subsection 22 , related to joint county-city 9 buildings shall be collected against all taxable property 10 within the taxing district without limitation by the provisions 11 of this subsection . 12 Sec. 6. Section 403.19, subsection 2, Code 2025, is amended 13 by adding the following new paragraph: 14 NEW PARAGRAPH . e. For urban renewal areas for which 15 an ordinance providing for a division of revenue is not 16 limited in duration under section 403.17, subsection 10, or 17 section 402.22, subsection 5, after twenty years following 18 the effective date of this Act or after twenty years from 19 the calendar year following the calendar year in which the 20 municipality first certifies to the county auditor the amount 21 of any loans, advances, indebtedness, or bonds which qualify 22 for payment from the division of revenue, whichever is later, 23 the amount determined under paragraph âaâ that may be paid into 24 the municipalityâs special fund shall not exceed sixty percent 25 of the amount otherwise determined under paragraph âaâ but for 26 this paragraph and such excess amounts shall be allocated and 27 paid to the respective taxing districts in the same manner as 28 amounts under subsection 1. 29 Sec. 7. Section 403.22, subsection 1, Code 2025, is amended 30 by adding the following new paragraph: 31 NEW PARAGRAPH . d. (1) For municipalities of any population 32 size, and notwithstanding any minimum low and moderate income 33 family housing requirement, if the public improvement project 34 is approved on or after July 1, 2025, and is related to housing 35 -2- LSB 2933XC (3) 91 jm/md 2/ 5 S.F. _____ and residential development in an economic development area 1 containing property that has been located entirely within the 2 corporate limits of a city for twenty years or more, the amount 3 to be provided for low and moderate income family housing for 4 such projects shall not be required to be greater than an 5 amount equal to twenty percent of the original project cost. 6 (2) In addition, notwithstanding subsection 5, the division 7 of the revenue under section 403.19 for each project under this 8 paragraph shall be limited to tax collections for twenty fiscal 9 years beginning with the second fiscal year after the year in 10 which the municipality first certifies to the county auditor 11 the amount of any loans, advances, indebtedness, or bonds 12 which qualify for payment from the division of the revenue in 13 connection with the project. 14 Sec. 8. APPLICABILITY. The section of this Act amending 15 section 403.19, subsection 2, applies to property taxes due and 16 payable in fiscal years beginning on or after July 1, 2027, 17 that are levied against any of the following: 18 1. Property located in an urban renewal area for which the 19 ordinance providing for a division of revenue takes effect on 20 or after January 1, 2026. 21 2. Property annexed or otherwise included in an urban 22 renewal area after the effective date of the ordinance 23 providing for a division of revenue if the annexation or 24 inclusion occurs on or after January 1, 2026. 25